Utah statutes.
31A-22-1003.   Comprehensive coverage.

Every insurance policy covering the liability of an employer under Title 34A, Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act, shall cover all types of workers' compensation benefits required to be provided under that chapter.  This section does not preclude primary and excess coverage being provided under different contracts.

